New Jersey, session 222, S3923.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 18 of P.L.2019, c.363 (C.52:17B-171.14) is amended to read as follows: 18.  a.  The Youth Justice Commission shall establish a program to collect, record, and analyze data regarding juveniles who were sentenced to a term of incarceration.  In furtherance of this program, the commission shall collect the following data: (1)   the offense for which the juvenile was incarcerated; the term of incarceration imposed on the juvenile, including a term of incarceration imposed for a violation of parole; the age, gender, race, and ethnicity of the juvenile; the county where the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent; the classification of the juvenile; and whether the juvenile was sentenced to an extended term of incarceration; (2)   aggregate data of incidents of violence, suicide, suicide attempts, hospitalizations, and any form of segregation or isolation of a juvenile for all facilities where juveniles are placed; and (3)   the amount of time remaining on each sentence of incarceration imposed on a juvenile whose parole was revoked; whether the violation that was the basis for the revocation was technical or based upon a new offense; the age, gender, race, and ethnicity of the juvenile; and the county where the juvenile's parole was revoked by the court. b.    The commission shall prepare and publish on its Internet website biennial reports summarizing the aggregated data collected, recorded, and analyzed pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.     The commission shall publish on its Internet website the criteria that are used to determine whether a juvenile is granted parole.  The commission also shall provide this information to every juvenile who is sentenced to a term of incarceration. d.    (1) The commission shall establish and maintain a registry, which shall be made available to the public on its Internet website, containing information regarding juveniles whose cases were waived to adult criminal court and are serving custodial sentences in a State juvenile facility operated by the commission pursuant to subsection f. of section 1 of P.L.2015, c.89 (C.2A:4A-26.1) and juveniles who elected to have their cases waived to adult criminal court pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-27) and are serving a custodial sentence in a State juvenile facility operated by the commission. (2)   The information contained in the registry required to be established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include the juveniles name; sentence; the name of the facility where the juvenile is serving a custodial sentence; parole eligibility or release date; criminal history; and any other information deemed appropriate by the commission. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.35, s.76) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.